Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.310

City sealers and deputies—Duties of governing body—Sealer to have standards comparison made every two years.

(1) The governing body of each city for which a city sealer has been appointed as provided for by RCW 19.94.280 shall:

(a) Procure at the expense of the city the official weights and measures standards and any field weights and measures standards necessary for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or any rule that may be prescribed by the director;

(b) Provide a suitable office for the city sealer and any deputies that have been duly appointed; and

(c) Make provision for the necessary clerical services, supplies, transportation and for defraying contingent expenses incidental to the official activities of the city sealer and his or her deputies in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) When the acquisition of the official weights and measures standards required under subsection (1)(a) of this section has been made and such weights and measures standards have been examined and approved by the director, they shall be the certified weights and measures standards for such city.

(3) In order to maintain field weights and measures standards in accurate condition, the city sealer shall, at least once every two years, compare the field weights and measures standards used within his or her city to the certified weights and measures standards of such city or to the official weights and measures standards of this state.

[ 2000 c 171 s 63; 1992 c 237 s 21; 1969 c 67 s 31.]